Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26

Criminal Detention Facilities Standards

12-26-101. Policy — Purpose of chapter.

It is declared to be the policy of the State of Arkansas that all criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities within the counties of the state shall conform to certain minimum standards of construction, maintenance, and operation.

It is the purpose of this chapter to implement this policy by establishing a criminal detention facility review committee within each of the criminal detention facility review committee districts of the state with the authority and responsibility to administer the provisions of this chapter and other laws enacted relating to standards for criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1210; Acts 2017, No. 153, § 1.

12-26-102. Definition.

As used in this chapter, “criminal detention facility” means any institution operated by a political subdivision or a combination of political subdivisions for the care, keeping, or rehabilitative needs of adult criminal offenders, including regional jails, county jails, municipal jails, and temporary holding units.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 2; 1985, No. 539, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1211; Acts 2001, No. 1185, § 2; 2003, No. 1473, § 26; 2017, No. 153, § 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted (1) and (3) through (5); deleted the (2) designation; and substituted “political subdivision or a combination of political subdivisions” for “political jurisdiction or a combination of jurisdictions”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

12-26-103. Office of Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator — Creation — Duties.

There is established the Office of Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator within the Department of Corrections which shall consist of:

A criminal detention facilities review coordinator, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor; and

An administrative assistant.

The office shall be responsible for promulgating minimum standards for the construction, maintenance, and operation of local, county, regional, or state criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The coordinator shall perform all duties necessary to assure uniformity in the interpretation and administration of the minimum standards by the several criminal facility detention review committees.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted former (a)(2) and redesignated former (a)(3) as present (a)(2); deleted “coordinator's” preceding “office” in (b); inserted “criminal facility detention review” in (c); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment inserted “within the Department of Corrections” in the introductory language of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Criminal Detention Facilities Review Commission, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1185, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 882, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 46-1220, 46-1221; Acts 1987, No. 881, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 69.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 3, provided that, as of the close of business on June 30, 1983, the Criminal Detention Facilities Board, created by Acts 1973, No. 244, § 3 [repealed], was abolished. The section further provided that all the powers, functions, and duties of that board would be assumed and carried out in accordance with the provisions of that act.

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District One is composed of the following counties: Baxter, Benton, Boone, Carroll, Madison, Marion, Newton, Searcy, and Washington;

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Two is composed of the following counties: Cleburne, Conway, Faulkner, Fulton, Independence, Izard, Sharp, Stone, Van Buren, and White;

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Three is composed of the following counties: Clay, Craighead, Greene, Jackson, Lawrence, Mississippi, Poinsett, and Randolph;

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Four is composed of the following counties: Crawford, Franklin, Johnson, Logan, Montgomery, Polk, Pope, Scott, Sebastian, and Yell;

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Five is composed of the following counties: Crittenden, Cross, Lee, Lonoke, Monroe, Phillips, Prairie, St. Francis, and Woodruff;

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Six is composed of the following counties: Arkansas, Garland, Grant, Hot Spring, Jefferson, Perry, Pulaski, and Saline;

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Seven is composed of the following counties: Clark, Columbia, Hempstead, Howard, Lafayette, Little River, Miller, Nevada, Ouachita, Pike, and Sevier; and

Criminal Detention Facility Review Committee District Eight is composed of the following counties: Ashley, Bradley, Calhoun, Chicot, Cleveland, Dallas, Desha, Drew, Lincoln, and Union.

A county in the district shall be represented on the committee by no more than one (1) member;

At least one (1) member on the committee shall be a youth services worker or juvenile advocate;

The Governor may reappoint a member of the committee to the committee at the end of the member's term; and

If a vacancy occurs on the committee, the remaining members of the committee shall notify in writing the Governor of the vacancy, and the Governor shall appoint another member to serve the remainder of the vacated term.

Each year the members of a committee shall elect one (1) member to serve as chair.

A committee shall function as a state agency.

A member of a committee has all of the rights and privileges of a state officer while performing his or her duties as assigned by this chapter.

Subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this section extends to any case that may arise as a result of the duties assigned by this chapter without a time limitation except as may already exist by other statutes.

A member of a committee shall receive no compensation or remuneration, however the state shall reimburse a member for clerical and typing expenses approved by the Criminal Detention Facilities Review Coordinator.

A member of a committee may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1983, No. 741, § 4, provided, in part, that the first criminal detention facility review committees would be appointed by May 1, 1983, and that they would assume their powers, functions, and duties as set forth in the act on July 1, 1983. The section further provided that the members first appointed to the commissions would draw lots for their respective terms so that the expiration dates of the terms of the members would be staggered over three (3) years.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1216; Acts 1989, No. 515, § 3; 2003, No. 1473, § 27; 2017, No. 153, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 693.

12-26-104. [Repealed.]

There are created eight (8) criminal detention facility review committee districts as follows:

(1)There is created within each district a criminal detention facility review committee to be composed of five (5) members who are residents within the district and who do not hold public office.

The Governor shall appoint the members of a committee for a term of four (4) years as follows:

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 4; 1985, No. 539, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1213; Acts 1989, No. 515, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 70; 2017, No. 153, § 4.

12-26-106. Powers and duties of a criminal detention facility review committee.

A criminal detention facility review committee shall:

Provide consultation and technical assistance to county and local government officials with respect to criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities;

Visit and inspect the criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities for compliance with the standards as established under § 12-26-103;

Advise government officials and other appropriate persons of deficiencies in the criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities and make recommendations for improvements;

Submit written reports of the inspections to appropriate agencies and persons as provided in § 12-26-107;

Review and comment on plans for the construction and major modification or renovation of the criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities; and

Perform such other duties as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the state regarding criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 153 substituted “a criminal detention facility review committee” for “committees” in the section heading; in the introductory language, substituted “A criminal detention facility review committee” for “The criminal detention facility review committees” and deleted “have the authority and responsibility to” from the end; and substituted “criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities” for “facilities” in (3).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 deleted “have the authority and responsibility to” at the end of the introductory language; and substituted “criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities” for “facilities” in (3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1215; Acts 1989, No. 515, § 2; 2017, No. 153, § 5; 2017, No. 250, § 17.